Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-399
Bridge; project payment; schedule.

(1) For any project to repair, retrofit, reconstruct, or replace any bridge, the county board may adopt a resolution which provides for project payment on a set schedule over a period of time that may extend for multiple years beyond the completion date for such project.

(2) This section shall provide full authority for the exercise of the power described in subsection (1) of this section by a county, and no further action shall be required by the county board under any other provision of state law except as provided under the Open Meetings Act prior to the exercise of such power. If there is any provision of law applicable to a county in conflict with this section, this section shall be controlling.

Laws 2024, LB190, § 1.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.